Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 9 Leases and Conditional Sales of Rolling Stock

46-8-270 through 46-8-272.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 188, §§ 1-3; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2790-2792; Code 1933, §§ 94-401 — 94-403; Ga. L. 1917, p. 55, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 8/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 8/SB 285 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2006.